Utah statutes.
11-17-16.   Publication of resolutions and notice of bonds to be issued.
(1) (a)  The governing body may provide for the publication of any resolution
or other proceeding adopted by it under this chapter, including all
resolutions providing for the sale or lease of any land by  the municipality,
county, or state university in connection with the establishment, acquisition,
development, maintenance, and operation of an industrial park.
(b) (i)  The publication shall be:
(A)  in a newspaper qualified to carry legal notices having general
circulation in the municipality or county; or
(B)  in the case of a state university,  in a newspaper of general circulation
in the county within which the principal administrative office of the state
university is located; and
(ii)  as required in Section 45-1-101.
(2)  In case of a resolution or other proceeding providing for the issuance of
bonds, the governing body may, in lieu of publishing the entire resolution or
other proceeding, publish a notice of bonds to be issued, titled as such,
containing:
(a)  the name of the issuer;
(b)  the purpose of the issue;
(c)  the name of the users, if known; and
(d)  the times and place where a copy of the resolution or other proceeding
may be examined, which shall be at an office of the issuer, identified in the
notice, during regular business hours of the issuer as described in the notice
and for a period of at least 30 days after the publication of the notice.
(3)  For a period of 30 days after publication any person in interest may
contest the legality of  the resolution, proceeding, any bonds which may be
authorized under them, or any provisions made for the security and payment of
the bonds.  After expiration of the 30-day period no person may contest the
regularity, formality, or legality of the resolution, proceedings, bonds, or
security provisions for any cause.
